Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62A.195] PROHIBITION ON COVERAGE OF CONVERSION THERAPY FOR MINORS AND VULNERABLE ADULTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Conversion therapy" has the meaning given in section 214.078, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (c) "Vulnerable adult" has the meaning given in section 626.5572, subdivision 21. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A health plan that is offered, sold, issued, or renewed to Minnesota residents must not include coverage for conversion therapy for an enrollee under 18 years of age or for an enrollee who is a vulnerable adult. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, sold, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Formulation of policies. (a) The commissioner shall formulate policies to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and shall do the following: (1) exercise leadership under the direction of the governor in the development of human rights policies and programs, and make recommendations to the governor and the legislature for their consideration and implementation; (2) establish and maintain a principal office in St. Paul, and any other necessary branch offices at any location within the state; (3) meet and function at any place within the state; (4) employ attorneys, clerks, and other employees and agents as the commissioner may deem necessary and prescribe their duties; (5) to the extent permitted by federal law and regulation, utilize the records of the Department of Employment and Economic Development of the state when necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter; (6) obtain upon request and utilize the services of all state governmental departments and agencies; (7) adopt suitable rules for effectuating the purposes of this chapter; (8) issue complaints, receive and investigate charges alleging unfair discriminatory practices, and determine whether or not probable cause exists for hearing; (9) subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, take testimony, and require the production for examination of any books or papers relative to any matter under investigation or in question as the commissioner deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter; (10) attempt, by means of education, conference, conciliation, and persuasion to eliminate unfair discriminatory practices as being contrary to the public policy of the state; (11) develop and conduct programs of formal and informal education designed to eliminate discrimination and intergroup conflict by use of educational techniques and programs the commissioner deems necessary; (12) make a written report of the activities of the commissioner to the governor each year; (13) accept gifts, bequests, grants, or other payments public and private to help finance the activities of the department; (14) create such local and statewide advisory committees as will in the commissioner's judgment aid in effectuating the purposes of the Department of Human Rights; (15) develop such programs as will aid in determining the compliance throughout the state with the provisions of this chapter, and in the furtherance of such duties, conduct research and study discriminatory practices based upon race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, familial status, sexual orientation, or other factors and develop accurate data on the nature and extent of discrimination and other matters as they may affect housing, employment, public accommodations, schools, and other areas of public life; (16) develop and disseminate technical assistance to persons subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to agencies and officers of governmental and private agencies; (17) provide staff services to such advisory committees as may be created in aid of the functions of the Department of Human Rights; (18) make grants in aid to the extent that appropriations are made available for that purpose in aid of carrying out duties and responsibilities; (19) cooperate and consult with the commissioner of labor and industry regarding the investigation of violations of, and resolution of complaints regarding section 363A.08, subdivision 7; and (20) analyze civil rights trends pursuant to this chapter, including information compiled from community organizations that work directly with historically marginalized communities, and prepare a report each biennium that recommends policy and system changes to reduce and prevent further civil rights incidents across Minnesota. The report shall be provided to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over the Department of Human Rights. This report must also be posted on the Department of Human Rights' public website and shared with community organizations that work with historically marginalized communities. In performing these duties, the commissioner shall give priority to those duties in clauses (8), (9), and (10) and to the duties in section 363A.36. (b) All gifts, bequests, grants, or other payments, public and private, accepted under paragraph (a), clause (13), must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a special account. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of human rights to help finance activities of the department. new text begin (c) The commissioner shall take all appropriate actions to protect Minnesotans from conversion therapy including, to the extent permissible, investigating charges and pursuing civil relief when the commissioner has reason to believe a mental health practitioner or mental health professional is engaging in unfair discriminatory practices. For purposes of this paragraph, "conversion therapy" has the meaning given in section 214.078, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end